Utah statutes.
57-16-10.   Utility service to mobile home parks -- Limitation on providers' charges.

Local water, sewer, and sanitation entities, including those administered by municipalities and counties which provide water, sewer, or garbage collection services shall not receive a greater percentage net return from supplying a mobile home park than said entity receives from other residential customers. The net return is determined by taking into consideration the costs of maintenance and depreciation of the mobile home park facilities and all savings on administrative costs, including cost of billing residents.

